Arkansas, session 2025, HB1574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(a), concerning residence of
canvassers, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(7) A person shall not act as a paid canvasser unless he or she
is:
(A) A resident of this state; and
(B) Domiciled in the state if acting as a paid canvasser
for a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(d), concerning the signing of
petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) A person acting as a sponsor or an agent of a sponsor shall not
knowingly hire a person as a paid canvasser who:
(A) Is not a resident of this state; and
(B) Is not domiciled in the state if acting as a paid
canvasser for a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum
petition.
*SSS017*
03-10-2025 11:18:59 SSS017

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1574
(2) A person who fails to comply with subdivision (d)(1) of this
section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each paid canvasser hired in
violation of subdivision (d)(1) of this section.
(e) When the official charged with verifying the signatures has
reasonable grounds to believe that one (1) or more signatures on a petition
is forged, the official shall report the suspected forgery and basis for
suspecting forgery to:
(1) The Division of Arkansas State Police, in the case of a
statewide petition; or
(2) The prosecuting attorney of the county, in the case of a
local petition.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. Severability.
If any provision of this act or the application of this act to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other
provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this act
are declared severable.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. The Supreme Court has interpreted domicile to
require "actual residence plus the intent to remain in a particular place".
Leathers v. Womack, 341 Ark. 609, 618 (2000). An individual may have only one
(1) domicile, and circumstances must present "a bona fide intention of making
it a fixed and permanent place of abode". Id. at. 619.

/s/Vaught









03-10-2025 11:18:59 SSS017